Hawaii statutes.
§707-711 Assault in the second degree.
(1) A person commits the offense of assault in the second degree if:

(a) The person intentionally or knowingly causes
substantial bodily injury to another;

(b) The person recklessly causes serious or
substantial bodily injury to another;

(c) The person intentionally or knowingly causes
bodily injury to a correctional worker, as defined in section 710-1031(2), who
is engaged in the performance of duty or who is within a correctional facility;

(d) The person intentionally or knowingly causes
bodily injury to another with a dangerous instrument;

(e) The person intentionally or knowingly causes
bodily injury to an educational worker who is engaged in the performance of
duty or who is within an educational facility. For the purposes of this
paragraph, "educational worker" means any administrator, specialist,
counselor, teacher, or employee of the department of education or an employee
of a charter school; a person who is a volunteer, as defined in section 90-1,
in a school program, activity, or function that is established, sanctioned, or
approved by the department of education; or a person hired by the department of
education on a contractual basis and engaged in carrying out an educational
function;

(f) The person intentionally or knowingly causes
bodily injury to any emergency medical services provider who is engaged in the
performance of duty. For the purposes of this paragraph, "emergency
medical services provider" means emergency medical services personnel, as
defined in section 321-222, and physicians, physician's assistants, nurses,
nurse practitioners, certified registered nurse anesthetists, respiratory
therapists, laboratory technicians, radiology technicians, and social workers,
providing services in the emergency room of a hospital;

(g) The person intentionally or knowingly causes
bodily injury to a person employed at a state-operated or ‑contracted
mental health facility. For the purposes of this paragraph, "a person
employed at a state-operated or -contracted mental health facility"
includes health care professionals as defined in section 451D-2,
administrators, orderlies, security personnel, volunteers, and any other person
who is engaged in the performance of a duty at a state-operated or -contracted
mental health facility;

(h) The person intentionally or knowingly causes
bodily injury to a person who:

(i) The defendant has been restrained from, by
order of any court, including an ex parte order, contacting, threatening, or
physically abusing pursuant to chapter 586; or

(ii) Is being protected by a police officer
ordering the defendant to leave the premises of that protected person pursuant
to section 709-906(4), during the effective period of that order; or

[(i)] The person intentionally or knowingly causes
bodily injury to any firefighter or water safety officer who is engaged in the
performance of duty. For the purposes of this paragraph, "firefighter"
has the same meaning as in section 710-1012 and "water safety officer"
means any public servant employed by the United States, the State, or any
county as a lifeguard or person authorized to conduct water rescue or ocean
safety functions.

(2) Assault in the second degree is a class C
felony. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1979, c 84, §1; am L 1986, c 314, §52; am
L 1987, c 257, §1; am L 1988, c 279, §1; am L 2006, c 230, §29 and c 298, §16;
am L 2007, c 9, §19 and c 79, §1; am L 2008, c 100, §7; am L 2010, c 146, §1;
am L 2011, c 63, §3 and c 187, §1]

Law Journals and Reviews

Cruelty to Animals: Recognizing Violence Against Nonhuman
Victims. 23 UH L. Rev. 307 (2000).

Case Notes

Assault in the third degree is not a lesser included
offense. 68 H. 276, 711 P.2d 1289 (1985).

Circuit court was obligated, even absent a request by either
party, to instruct the jury regarding the included offense of assault in the third
degree where appellant was charged with committing offense of assault in the second
degree; court's failure to do so constituted plain error. 76 H. 387, 879 P.2d
492 (1994).

Conviction of defendant of offense of carrying, using or
threatening to use a firearm in the commission of a separate felony under
§134-6(a) and (e), the separate felony being second degree assault under
subsection (1)(a), vacated where there was no substantial evidence that
defendant caused substantial bodily injury to victim as required under
subsection (1)(a). 94 H. 241, 11 P.3d 466 (2000).

The plain and unambiguous language of §853-4(2) does not
prohibit the grant of a deferred acceptance of no contest plea for assault in
the second degree under this section causing "substantial bodily injury",
as statutory prohibition expressly applies only to felony and misdemeanor
assaults inflicting "bodily injury" or "serious bodily injury".
101 H. 409, 70 P.3d 635 (2003).

Court's failure to personally engage defendant in
on-the-record colloquy to determine whether defendant understood consequences
of foregoing right to have jury instructed on third degree assault, the
lesser-included offense of second degree assault, constituted plain error. 85
H. 44 (App.), 936 P.2d 1292 (1997).

Trial court's omission of the "strongly corroborative"
paragraph in the attempted assault in the second degree instructions was
presumptively prejudicial and omission was not harmless beyond a reasonable
doubt. 104 H. 517 (App.), 92 P.3d 1027 (2004).

Although the evidence was insufficient to show that defendant
committed the offense of first degree assault, there was ample evidence to show
that the victim's injury satisfied the definition of "substantial bodily
injury" under §707-700 and that defendant thus committed the lesser
included offense of second degree assault in violation of subsection (1)(a);
thus the jury, having returned a guilty verdict against defendant for first degree
assault, must also have found sufficient evidence to prove the lesser included
offense of second degree assault. 116 H. 445 (App.), 173 P.3d 592 (2007).

Cited: 55 H. 531, 534, 523 P.2d 299 (1974).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next